Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2367.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5386YH (3) 91 lh/jh H.F. 2367 Section 1. Section 499C.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 6A. âNative vegetationâ means plant species 3 that are indigenous to Iowa and were present in the state prior 4 to European settlement, including but not limited to native 5 grasses, flowers, shrubs, and trees. 6 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 499C.3 Native vegetation. 7 1. A unit owners association shall not prohibit any unit 8 owner from planting or growing native vegetation on the unit 9 ownerâs lawn so long as the area is maintained predominately 10 free of weeds, invasive species, and trash, and the native 11 vegetation does not extend over or onto neighboring properties, 12 public or common sidewalks, pathways, streets or other public 13 or common areas or elements, and does not interfere with 14 traffic or utilities. 15 2. A unit owners association may adopt reasonable rules and 16 regulations governing a planned, intentional, and maintained 17 landscape of native vegetation that do not impair the native 18 vegetationâs proper maintenance and care or impose height 19 restrictions. 20 3. This section shall not apply to common areas or elements 21 or to other property owned by the unit owners association in 22 which the unit owner does not have authority to landscape or 23 plant. 24